California, session 20252026, AB549.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 8594.20) is added to Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 6.6. Mega Sporting Events8594.20. For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:(a) “Mega sporting events” means the 2026 FIFA World Cup games, the Super Bowl LXI 2027, the Summer Olympic Games 2028, and the Paralympic Games 2028.(b) “Office” means the Office of Emergency Services.8594.21. (a) The office shall, in collaboration with host cities, counties, host committees, and partners, prepare for the planning, resourcing, management, and delivery of safety and security at the mega sporting events and official watch parties.(b) The office shall, in furtherance of this section, consider the work of the office’s Large Stadium Initiative and the office’s experience implementing the federal National Special Security Event planning and preparedness activities.(c) The office shall, in furtherance of this section, consider ways to increase safety around and reduce the risk of all of the following issues at mega sporting events:(1) Human trafficking, including all of the following strategies:(A) Businesses involved with the sporting events are urged to monitor their supply chains for potential risks, such as human trafficking.(B) Posting the Department of Justice’s notice informing the public and victims of human trafficking of hotline numbers to seek help or report unlawful activity in all listed or legally required establishments pursuant to Section 52.6 of the Civil Code.(C) Hotel staff training to recognize the signs of human trafficking and understand the proper procedures for reporting any suspected incidents.(D) Collaboration with law enforcement to reduce trafficking in high-risk areas where trafficking is more likely to occur, particularly during large-scale events.(E) Connecting victims of trafficking to existing resources.(2) Racism, sexism, and other forms of discrimination.(3) Any other safety issue that may arise at a national-level sporting event.(d) At least six months before the start of the 2026 FIFA World Cup games, one year before the Super Bowl LXI 2027, and one year before the Summer Olympic Games and Paralympic Games 2028, the office shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the cities counties hosting the mega sporting events to implement the safety and security activities described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.